Nebraska, session 109, LB1026.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1026 LB1026
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 70-1001.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1001.01 For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1028.02 and
section 2 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Nebraska Power Review Board;
(2) Commercial electric vehicle charging station means equipment
designed to provide electricity for a fee for the charging of an electric
vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, including an electric
vehicle direct-current charger or a super-fast charger, any successor
technology, and all components thereof. Commercial electric vehicle
charging station does not include the residence of a person where an
electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle is charged if no
customer usage fee is charged;
(3) Commercial electric vehicle charging station operator means a
person, partnership, corporation, or other business entity or political
subdivision that operates a commercial electric vehicle charging station;
(4) Direct-current, fast-charging station means a publicly available
charging system capable of delivering at least fifty kilowatts of direct-
current electrical power to an electric vehicle's rechargeable battery at
a voltage of two hundred volts or greater;
(5) Direct-current, fast-charging station operator means a person,
partnership, corporation, or other business entity that operates a
direct-current, fast-charging station open to the public. The term does
not include an electric supplier or a political subdivision;
(6) Electric supplier or supplier of electricity means any legal
entity supplying, producing, or distributing electricity within the state
for sale at wholesale or retail. Electric supplier does not include a
commercial electric vehicle charging station operator that is a private
person or privately owned partnership, privately owned corporation, or
other privately owned business;
(7) Electronic-related means relating to electronic devices,
-2-

LB1026 LB1026
2026 2026
circuits, or similar systems, or the components of such electronic
devices, circuits, or similar systems, that require electrical currents
or electromagnetism to operate;
(8) Foreign adversary means a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15
C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on February 7, 2025;
(9) Military installation means:
(a) A United States Air Force ballistic missile silo located within
the geographic area described in 31 C.F.R. 802.211(b)(3), as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2025; or
(b) A United States Air Force base described in 31 C.F.R.
802.227(c), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(10) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle has the same meaning as in
section 60-345.01;
(11) Private electric supplier means an electric supplier producing
electricity from a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that is not a public power district, a public power and
irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership
association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof. A
private electric supplier is limited to the development of those
facilities as provided in subdivision (12) of this section;
(12) Privately developed renewable energy generation facility means
and is limited to a facility that (a) generates electricity using solar,
wind, geothermal, biomass, landfill gas, or biogas, including all
electrically connected equipment used to produce, collect, and store the
facility output up to and including the transformer that steps up the
voltage to sixty thousand volts or greater, and including supporting
structures, buildings, and roads, unless otherwise agreed to in a joint
transmission development agreement, (b) is developed, constructed, and
owned, in whole or in part, by one or more private electric suppliers,
-3-

LB1026 LB1026
2026 2026
and (c) is not wholly owned by a public power district, a public power
and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership
association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof;
(13) Regional transmission organization means an entity independent
from those entities generating or marketing electricity at wholesale or
retail, which has operational control over the electric transmission
lines in a designated geographic area in order to reduce constraints in
the flow of electricity and ensure that all power suppliers have open
access to transmission lines for the transmission of electricity;
(14) Reliable or reliability means the ability of an electric
supplier to supply the aggregate electric power and energy requirements
of its electricity consumers in Nebraska at all times under normal
operating conditions, taking into account scheduled and unscheduled
outages, including sudden disturbances or unanticipated loss of system
components that are to be reasonably expected for any electric utility
following prudent utility practices, recognizing certain weather
conditions and other contingencies may cause outages at the distribution,
transmission, and generation level;
(15) Representative organization means an organization designated by
the board and organized for the purpose of providing joint planning and
encouraging maximum cooperation and coordination among electric
suppliers. Such organization shall represent electric suppliers owning a
combined electric generation plant accredited capacity of at least ninety
percent of the total electric generation plant accredited capacity
constructed and in operation within the state;
(16) State means the State of Nebraska; and
(17) Unbundled retail rates means the separation of utility bills
into the individual price components for which an electric supplier
charges its retail customers, including, but not limited to, the separate
charges for the generation, transmission, and distribution of
-4-

LB1026 LB1026
2026 2026
electricity.
Sec. 2. (1) An electric supplier shall not retire, shutdown, cease
operation of, or substantially alter the operation of any electric
generation facility or privately developed renewable energy generation
facility if the electric supplier has customers waiting for electric
service unless such retirement, shutdown, cessation, or alteration is due
to any of the following reasons:
(a) The facility's retirement, shutdown, cessation, or alteration is
mandated by federal or state law;
(b) The facility is mechanically unsafe to operate;
(c) The facility is damaged beyond repair due to a natural disaster;
or
(d) Continuing operation of the facility is uneconomical.
(2) Before the retirement, shutdown, cessation, or alteration can
occur, the governing body of the electric supplier shall identify the
reasons for the retirement, shutdown, cessation, or alteration in a
resolution and such resolution shall include at least one of the reasons
described in subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 3. Original section 70-1001.01, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-5-